Washington statutes.
RCW 8.26.190

Acquisition of buildings, structures, and improvements.

(1) Where any interest in real property is acquired, the acquiring agency shall acquire an equal interest in all buildings, structures, or other improvements located upon the real property so acquired and which is required to be removed from such real property or which is determined to be adversely affected by the use to which such real property will be put.

(2) For the purpose of determining the just compensation to be paid for any building, structure, or other improvement required to be acquired under subsection (1) of this section, such building, structure, or other improvement shall be deemed to be a part of the real property to be acquired notwithstanding the right or obligation of a tenant of the lands, as against the owner of any other interest in the real property, to remove such building, structure, or improvement at the expiration of his or her term, and the fair market value which such building, structure, or improvement contributes to the fair market value of the real property to be acquired, or the fair market value of such building, structure, or improvement for removal from the real property, whichever is the greater, shall be paid to the owner of such building, structure, or improvement.

(3) Payment for such building, structure, or improvement under subsection (1) of this section shall not result in duplication of any payments otherwise authorized by state law. No such payment shall be made unless the owner of the land involved disclaims all interest in the improvements of the tenant. In consideration for any such payment, the tenant shall assign, transfer, and release all his or her right, title, and interest in and to such improvements. Nothing with regard to the above mentioned acquisition of buildings, structures, or other improvements shall be construed to deprive the tenant of any rights to reject payment and to obtain payment for such property interests in accordance with other laws of this state.

[ 2011 c 336 s 283; 1988 c 90 s 13; 1971 ex.s. c 240 s 19.]

NOTES:

Section captions—1988 c 90: See note following RCW 8.26.010.